Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.095

Summons to persons selected.

(1) Persons selected to serve on a petit jury, grand jury, or jury of inquest shall be summoned by mail or personal service, or electronically. The county clerk shall issue summons and thereby notify persons selected for jury duty. The clerk may issue summons for any jury term, in any consecutive twelve-month period, at any time thirty days or more before the beginning of the jury term for which the summons are issued. However, when applicable, the provisions of RCW 2.36.130 apply.

(2) In courts of limited jurisdiction summons shall be issued by the court. Upon the agreement of the courts, the county clerk may summon jurors for any and all courts in the county or judicial district.

[ 2023 c 316 s 3; 2013 c 246 s 1; 1993 c 408 s 8; 1992 c 93 s 4; 1990 c 140 s 1; 1988 c 188 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.